Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB695.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Immunization Freedom Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Health care facility." A facility that is licensed by the department to operate as a health care facility under the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Health care practitioner." As defined in section 103 of the 123456789101112131415161718 Health Care Facilities Act."Health care provider." An individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a corporation, the Commonwealth or a political subdivision or instrumentality of the Commonwealth that operates a health care facility."Health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides hospital, medical or surgical health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A fixed indemnity policy.(7) An adult-only dental only policy.(8) A vision only policy.(9) A workers' compensation policy.(10) An automobile medical payment policy.(11) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(12) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."Insurer." An entity that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health, accident or sickness insurance policy, contract or plan, and that is governed under any of the following:(1) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).20250HB0695PN0711 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(3) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(4) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act."License." Any of the following:(1) A license issued by a Commonwealth licensing agency or board to an individual to practice as a health care practitioner.(2) A license issued to a health care provider by the department to operate as a health care facility.Section 3. Vaccination schedule for pediatric patients.(a) Vaccination schedule.--A health care practitioner shall continue to provide pediatric care to a patient if the parent or legal guardian of the patient chooses to utilize a vaccination schedule that varies from the vaccination schedule recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention if the patient receives at least one vaccination each calendar year.(b) Meeting request.--A health care practitioner may request a meeting with the parent or legal guardian of a patient receiving pediatric care to discuss a proposed vaccination schedule. The health care practitioner may not bill the patient, the patient's parent or legal guardian or the patient's insurer for a meeting under this subsection.(c) Waiting room.--A health care practitioner may establish a secure waiting room in a health care facility for patients who utilize a vaccination schedule that varies from the vaccination schedule recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and 20250HB0695PN0711 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Prevention. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize a health care practitioner to limit the hours that patients receiving pediatric care can schedule appointments with the health care practitioner in a manner to restrict the ability of the patients to have their health care needs met.(d) Standing order.--Upon agreeing on a vaccination schedule with the parent or legal guardian of a patient receiving pediatric care, a health care practitioner may issue a standing order to a designee of the health care practitioner to ensure that the patient utilizes the vaccination schedule. A standing order under this subsection may not prohibit the compensation or reimbursement of a health care practitioner for other services rendered by the health care practitioner.Section 4. Coverage, compensation or reimbursement for vaccinations.(a) Insurers.--An insurer may not refuse to provide coverage under a health insurance policy or compensate or reimburse a health care practitioner operating within the scope practice for a vaccination administered on a schedule that varies from the vaccination schedule recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.(b) Financial incentives.--Except for compensating or reimbursing a health care practitioner for the cost of a vaccination and the administration of a vaccination, an insurer may not provide financial incentives to a health care practitioner to provide vaccinations on a per-member basis.Section 5. Penalties.A health care practitioner who violates section 3 shall be subject to administrative penalties imposed by the health care practitioner's Commonwealth licensing agency or board for 20250HB0695PN0711 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unprofessional conduct.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0695PN0711 - 5 - 123